Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,169
Farm truck; unauthorized use; penalty.

Any person using a truck or combination of a truck or truck-tractor and trailer registered as a farm truck pursuant to section 60-3,146 in violation of the uses authorized shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor and shall be required to register such truck or combination of a truck or truck-tractor and trailer as a commercial motor vehicle or commercial trailer for the entire registration period in which the violation occurred.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 169.